Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1586
Statement of purpose.

The Legislature finds that it is a public purpose of the state to properly develop the water and related land resources of the state and that it is in the public interest (1) to provide financial assistance to programs and projects essential to the development, preservation, and maintenance of the state's water and related land resources, including programs and projects for the (a) abatement of pollution, (b) reduction of potential flood damages, (c) reservation of lands for resource development projects, (d) provision of public irrigation facilities, (e) preservation and development of fish and wildlife resources, (f) protection and improvement of public lands, (g) provision of public outdoor recreation lands and facilities, (h) provision and preservation of the waters of the state for all beneficial uses, including domestic, agricultural, and manufacturing uses, (i) conservation of land resources, and (j) protection of the health, safety, and general welfare of the people, and (2) to provide financial assistance to natural resources districts in the preparation of management plans pursuant to section 46-709.

Laws 1974, LB 975, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1977), § 2-3263;

Laws 1984, LB 1106, § 16;

Laws 1996, LB 108, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 1.